Hawaii statutes.
§467-24 Maximum liability.
Notwithstanding any other provision, the liability of the real estate recovery
fund shall not exceed $50,000 for any one licensee. [L 1967, c 187, pt of §1;
HRS §467-24; am L 1977, c 197, §2; am L 1983, c 116, §7]

Case Notes

Change in maximum liability of recovery fund did not apply to
cases where cause of action accrued before change took effect. 64 H. 74, 636
P.2d 1344 (1981).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next